District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.10

Exclusions.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to:

(1)

Any group health benefit plan for any plan year if, on the first day of such plan year, such plan has less than 2 participants who are current employees; or

(2)

Any health benefit plan for any of the excepted benefits.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 310, 45 DCR 8433
1981 Ed., § 35-1040.

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.

See notes to § 31-3301.01.